en: milk mineral concentrate
ca: concentrat de minerals de la llet
de: Milchmineralkonzentrat
es: Concentrado de minerales de leche
fr: concentré des minéraux du lait, concentré de minéraux du lait
hr: mineralni koncentrat mlijeka
it: concentrato minerale di latte
nl: melkmineralenconcentraat

fr: lactose et minéraux du lait
ca: lactosa i minerals de la llet
es: lactosa y minerales de la leche
nl: lactose en melkmineralen

en: yogurt, yoghurt, yogourt, yoghourt
bg: кисело мляко
ca: Iogurt
cs: Jogurt
da: Yoghurt
de: Joghurt, Jogurt
es: Yogur
fi: jogurtti, jukurtti, jugurtti
fr: yaourt, yogourt, yahout, yoghourt
hr: jogurt
hu: joghurt
it: yogurt
ja: ヨーグルト
lv: jogurts
nb: yoghurt
nl: Joghurt, yoghurt, jogurt
pl: Jogurt, jogurtu, jogurtowy
pt: Iogurte
ro: iaurt
ru: йогурт
sv: yoghurt
th: นมเปรี้ยว
tr: yoğurt
zh: 酸奶

en: plain yogurt
hr: običan jogurt
it: yogurt naturale
pl: jogurt naturalny

en: sweetened plain yogurt
ca: iogurt natural ensucrat
de: Joghurt gesüßt, Naturjoghurt gesüßt
es: yogur natural azucarado
hr: zaslađeni obični jogurt
it: yogurt naturale zuccherato

en: organic yogurt
ca: iogurt ecològic, iogurt eco
es: yogur ecológico, yogur eco
fi: luomujogurtti, luomu jogurtti
hr: organski jogurt
hu: bio joghurt
it: yogurt biologico
nl: biologische yoghurt

en: pasteurized milk yogurt
ca: iogurt de llet pasteuritzada
de: Joghurt aus pasteurisierter MIlch
es: yogur de leche pasteurizada
fr: yogourt au lait pasteurisé
hr: pasterizirano mlijeko jogurt
it: yogurt di latte pastorizzato

en: yogurt from pasteurized milk with milk fat
hr: jogurt od pasteriziranog mlijeka s mliječne masti
it: yogurt di latte pastorizzato con grassi del latte

en: solid yogurt made from pasteurized milk with 3.2% milk fat
hr: čvrsti jogurt od pasterizi̇ranog mlijeka s 3,2% mlijećne masti

en: yogurt from pasteurized milk with 3 5 milk fat
hr: jogurt od pasteriziranog mlijeka s 3 5 mliječne masti
it: yogurt di latte pastorizzato con 3,5 grassi del latte

fr: yogourt partiellement écrémé
ca: iogurt parcialment desnatat, iogurt semidesnatat
es: yogur parcialmente desnatado, yogur semidesnatado

en: skimmed yogurt, fat free yogurt, low fat yogurt
ca: iogurt magre
de: entrahmter Joghurt, entrahmtem Joghurt, Magermilchjoghurt, fettarmer Joghurt, Joghurt aus entrahmter Milch, Magermilch-Joghurt
es: yogur desnatado, yogur magro
fi: rasvaton jogurtti
fr: Yaourt écrémé, yaourt maigre, yogourt maigre
hr: obrani jogurt
hu: sovány joghurt
it: Yogurt magro
nl: magere yoghurt

en: whole milk yogurt
ca: iogurt de llet sencera
de: Vollmilchjoghurt, Joghurt mit natürlichem Fettgehalt, Joghurt aus Vollmilch
es: yogur de leche entera
fi: täysmaitojogurtti
fr: yogourt au lait entier, yaourt au lait entier
hr: jogurt od punomasnog mlijeka
nl: volle yoghurt, volle melk yoghurt

en: yogurt powder
ca: iogurt en pols
de: Joghurtpulver
es: yogur en polvo
fi: jogurttijauhe
fr: yaourt en poudre
hr: jogurt u prahu
hu: joghurtpor
it: yogurt in polvere
lv: jogurta pulveris
pl: jogurt w proszku, proszek jogurtowy
sv: yoghurtpulver

en: whole milk yogurt powder
ca: iogurt de llet sencera en pols
de: Vollmilchjoghurtpulver
es: yogur de leche entera en polvo
fi: täysmaitojogurttijauhe
hr: punomasno mlijeko jogurt u prahu
it: yogurt intero in polvere

en: skimmed milk yogurt powder
de: Magermilchjoghurtpulver
es: yogur descremado en polvo, yogurt descremado en polvo, yogur en polvo descremado, yogur desnatado en polvo, yogurt desnatado en polvo
fi: jogurttijauhe rasvattomasta maidosta
fr: Poudre de yaourt au lait écrémé
hr: jogurt u prahu od obranog mlijeka
it: Yogurt magro in polvere
nb: skummetmelkyoghurtpulver
sv: skumyoghurtpulver, skummjölksyoghurtpulver

en: whole yogurt
ca: iogurt sencer
de: Rahmjoghurt, Sahnejoghurt
es: yogur entero
fi: täysjogurtti, kermajogurtti
fr: yaourt entier
hr: punomasni jogurt
hu: teljes joghurt
it: yogurt intero
nl: roomyoghurt

en: mild yogurt
ca: iogurt ensucrat
de: Joghurt mild, Joghmild
fr: yaourt doux
hr: blagi jogurt
it: yogurt delicato
nl: milde yogurt

en: skimmed mild yogurt
de: Joghurt mild aus entrahmter Milch, Joghurt mild aus Magermilch, Fettarmer Joghurt mild
fr: yaourt doux écrémé
hr: obrani blagi jogurt
it: yogurt dolce magro

en: semi-skimmed mild yogurt
fr: Yaourt doux semi-écrémé
hr: poluobrani blagi jogurt